Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.29
Fifteen-hour National Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice Course, defined.

Fifteen-hour National Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice Course means the course as approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2212.01;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 21;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.13;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 18.
April 12, 2018